District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, that this
act may be cited as the "Captive Insurance Company Amendment Act of 2026".
Sec. 2. The Captive Insurance Company Act of 2004, effective March 17, 2005 (D.C.
Law 15-262; D.C. Official Code§ 31-3931.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a-1) of Section 4 (D.C. Official Code§ 31-3931.03) is amended by
striking the phrase "articles of incorporation" and inserting the phrase "articles of incorporation
or organization" in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) of Section 5 (D.C. Official Code§ 31-3931.04) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (6) is repealed.
(2) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the phrase "articles of incorporation" and
inserting the phrase "articles of incorporation or organization" in its place.
(3) Paragraph (8)(A) is amended by striking the phrase "shall not own shares" and
inserting the phrase "shall not own shares, units, or interests" in its place.


(4) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “protected cell captive
insurer” and inserting the phrase “protected cell captive insurer that is approved to form one or
more protected cells” in its place.
(5) Paragraph (12) is amended by striking the phrase “abbreviation “IC”” and
inserting the phrase “abbreviation “IC” in its name” in its place.
(c) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3931.06) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “form of cash or an
irrevocable letter of credit” and inserting the phrase “form of cash, cash equivalents, or an
irrevocable letter of credit” in its place.
(2) Subsection (d)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Be issued by a bank that is a member of the United States Federal Reserve
System, or its deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, a credit union
whose members’ deposits are insured by the National Credit Union Administration, or a bank
chartered in a foreign jurisdiction approved by the Commissioner.”.
(3) Subsection (k) is amended by striking the phrase “to make the a payment” and
inserting the phrase “to make the payment” in its place.
(d) Section 10 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3931.09) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) A captive insurer, including protected cells, shall apply to the Commissioner for a
certificate of authority. The application shall include:”.
(2) New subsections (d-1) through (d-3) are added to read as follows:
“(d-1) The Commissioner may issue a certificate authority for one or more protected cells
of a protected cell captive insurer, on an expedited basis. To be eligible for an expedited


certificate of authority, a captive manager shall initially file a complete application for a
protected cell. Upon approval of the initial protected cell, a captive manager shall file the
following information for the licensing of subsequent protected cells:
“(1) Captive Insurance Company Application and Business Plan Summary
form—22(c);
“(2) A business plan;
“(3) Five-year financial proformas, including support for premiums and estimated
losses;
“(4) Draft corporate documents for an incorporated cell;
“(5) Any information and documents that differ from the information and
documents in the application for the initial cell.”
“(d-2) Once the documents in paragraph (d-1) and executed corporate documents for
incorporated cells have been received, the Commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to
the captive manager within two business days.
“(d-3) The Commissioner, with agreement of a manager, deviate from the processes in (d-
1) and (d-2) to may issue a certificate authority for one or more protected cells of a protected cell
captive insurer, on an expedited basis, as long as the amended process is similar to those in
subsections (d-1) and (d-2).”.
(3) Subsection (f) is amended to read as follows:
“(f)(1) A captive insurer shall include its strategic business plan with its application for
the issuance of its certificate of authority. If the captive insurer intends to make any material or
substantive changes to its strategic business plan, the captive insurer shall file a copy of the
amended strategic business plan with the Commissioner for prior written approval.


“(2) A pure captive insurer or a protected cell captive, including its protected
cells, except for protected cells of a risk retention group, may make a material or substantive
change to its strategic business plan without the Commissioner’s prior written approval if the
captive insurer’s board of directors and captive manager determine that the change does not
violate any applicable law or regulation and does increase the risk of insolvency. The captive
insurer or its captive manager shall notify the Commissioner of any such change in writing
within thirty (30) days of such change. The Commissioner may disallow a material or
substantive change to a pure captive insurer’s strategic business plan if such change violates an
applicable law or regulation or the change threatens the solvency of the captive insurer or
protected cell.”.
(e) Section 12 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3931.11) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c)(3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) Make adequate arrangements with a bank chartered in the District, a bank
that is a member of the United States Federal Reserve System or the deposits of which are
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, a credit union whose members’ deposits
are insured by the National Credit Union Administration, or a bank chartered in a foreign
jurisdiction that is approved by the Commissioner;”
(2) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “in the District”.
(f) A new section 12a (D.C. Official Code § 31-3931.11a) is added to read as follows:
“§ 31-3931.11a Inactive Captive Insurance Companies.”
“(a) The Commissioner may place a captive insurance company, other than a risk
retention group, in an inactive status if such captive insurance company satisfies the following:
“(1) The captive insurer has ceased transacting the business of insurance;


100 “(2) There are no remaining liabilities associated with policies written or assumed
101 by the captive; and
102 “(3) The captive insurer is in compliance with all applicable District laws and
103 regulations.
104 “(b) An inactive captive insurer shall maintain unimpaired capital and surplus in an
105 amount determined by the Commissioner.
106 “(c) An inactive captive insurer shall not be subject to or liable for the payment of any
107 premium taxes or fees for any full year the captive insurance company is inactive.
108 “(d) The Commissioner may, by rulemaking, exempt an inactive captive insurer from any
109 filing or reporting requirements required by this Chapter.
110 “(e) An inactive captive insurer shall obtain written approval from the Commissioner
111 prior to resuming the business of insurance.”.
112 (g) Section 13 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3931.12) is amended as follows:
113 (1) Subsection (a-1) is amended by striking the phrase “March 2” and inserting
114 the phrase “March 1” in its place.
115 (2) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “March 2” and inserting
116 the phrase “March 1” in its place.
117 (3) A new subsection (b-1) is added to read as follows:
118 “(b-1) “Net direct premiums” shall include all premiums, fees, levies, or
119 assessments charged by a captive insurer, even if billed separately to policyholders. Net direct
120 premiums shall be reported on the premium schedule in the captive insurer’s annual statement.”.
121 (4) Subsection (i) is amended by striking the phrase “the a request” and inserting
122 the phrase “the request” in its place.


123 (h) Section 14 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3931.13) is amended as follows:
124 (1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “March 2” and inserting
125 the phrase “March 1” in its place.
126 (2) Paragraph (2) of Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “March 2”
127 and inserting the phrase “March 1” in its place.
128 (3) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
129 “(d) Documents, materials, and other information submitted pursuant to this section, and
130 any rules promulgated thereunder, shall be confidential and shall be exempt from the Freedom
131 of Information Act of 1976, effective March 29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-
132 531 et seq.), and shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery or admissible in evidence in a
133 private civil action, and shall not be divulged to any person except either as provided for in this
134 subsection or with the written consent of the captive insurer or protected cell.”.
135 (i) Subsection (a) of Section 23 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3931.22) is amended to read as
136 follows:
137 “(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, no other chapter of this title
138 shall apply to captive insurers. The following laws shall apply to risk retention groups licensed as
139 captive insurers:”.
140 (j) Section 204 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3932.04) is amended by adding a new
141 subsection (f-1) to read as follows:
142 “(f-1) The Commissioner may require the applicant to retain legal, financial, or
143 examination services from outside the Department to review and make recommendations
144 regarding the applicant’s qualifications, and to submit those reports and recommendations to the
145 Commissioner for his or her review. The cost of those services shall be paid by the applicant.”.


146 Sec. 3. The Risk Retention Act of 1993, effective October 21, 1993 (D.C. Law 10-46;
147 D.C. Official Code § 31-4101 et seq.), is amended by adding a new Section 14 (to read as
148 follows:
149 “Sec. 14 Rulemaking Authority.
150 “The Commissioner may issue rules relating to captive insurers licensed as risk retention
151 groups as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.”.
152 Sec. 4. Effective date.
153 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
154 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
155 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
156 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
157 Columbia Register.


GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Nicole West
Policy Advisor
Department of Insurance, Securities & Banking
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: May 23, 2025
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the “Captive Insurance Company Amendment Act of
2026”
(AE-25-49)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov